District of Columbia statutes.
1-622.16

Post-employment benefits.

An annuitant may elect to convert group life insurance benefits authorized in § 1-622.03 to an individual policy upon separation from service.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2216
as added Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 1201(e), 57 DCR 181

Cross References

Merit system, effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.
Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program (TANF), workers’ compensation coverage, see § 4-205.19k.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1201(e) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1201(e) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).